Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.160

Enforcement.

County and state law enforcement officers, the *liquor control board and its enforcement agents, and employees of the department shall enforce this chapter.

[ 2006 c 330 s 19.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.